Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201621-318
List of corporations; duty of Secretary
of State.

It shall be the duty of the Secretary of State
to prepare and keep a correct list of all corporations subject to sections
21-301 to 21-330 and engaged in business
within this state. For the purpose
of obtaining the necessary information, the Secretary of State, or other person
deputized by him or her, shall have access to the records of the offices of
the county clerks of the state.

Laws 1913, c. 240, § 18, p. 751;

R.S.1913, § 778;

C.S.1922, § 696;

C.S.1929, § 24-1718;

R.S.1943, § 21-318;

Laws 1988, LB 800, § 3;

Laws 2014, LB749, § 249.